Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-207
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 58-207.01 to 58-225 shall be used.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 1084, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 706, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 693, § 4.